Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the School Security
Revolving Fund as created by Section 5-148.2 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Fifty Million Dollars
($50,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to implement
the provisions of Section 5-148.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 15824 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15824 SW 12/23/25




















Req. No. 15824 Page 2